New York, session 2025-2026, A9372.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6438-e 2 to read as follows: 3 § 6438-e. Disclosure requirements for student clubs and organizations. 4 1. Any club or organization approved, recognized, or funded by a college 5 in the state shall disclose to the administration of the respective 6 institution the name and contact information of at least one: 7 (a) president, or individual acting in the capacity or function of a 8 president; 9 (b) treasurer, or individual responsible for managing, overseeing, or 10 controlling funds or financial accounts; and 11 (c) individual responsible for creating, managing, overseeing, or 12 administering communications on social media applications. 13 2. The individuals disclosed under subdivision one of this section may 14 be a student, faculty advisor, or other designated representative. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14229-03-5